trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.is.dix
    <pardef n="næst/ur__adj"> <!-- Only declines in the superlative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="næstur"><i>næst</i><par n="næst/ur__adj"/></e>
